West Virginia, session 2026, SB55.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. CRIMES AGAINST PUBLIC JUSTICE. §61-5-17a. Obstructing a law-enforcement officer, probation officer, parole officer, courthouse security officer, correctional officer, the State Fire Marshal, a deputy or assistant fire marshal, firefighter, or emergency medical service personnel, home incarceration supervisor, or social services worker causing death; penalty. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, any person who knowingly, willfully, and forcibly obstructs or hinders a law-enforcement officer, probation officer, parole officer, courthouse security officer, correctional officer, the State Fire Marshal, a deputy or assistant fire marshal, firefighter, or emergency medical service personnel, home incarceration supervisor, or social services worker lawfully acting in his or her official capacity and thereby proximately causes the death of a law-enforcement officer, probation officer, parole officer, courthouse security officer, correctional officer, the State Fire Marshal, a deputy or assistant fire marshal, firefighter, or emergency medical service personnel, home incarceration supervisor, or social services worker so acting, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for a term of 15 20 years to life. A person imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this section is not eligible for parole prior to having served a minimum of 20 years of his or her sentence.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) "forcibly" "Forcibly" means actions which involve the use of physical force;(2) "Home incarceration supervisor" means a person employed to supervise persons in home incarceration through a home incarceration program; and(3) "Social services worker" means a person employed by a governmental or private entity to provide social services such as investigating allegations of child or adult abuse or neglect, working with delinquent youth, or providing mental health and educational assistance through field work and home visits. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home